src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON	_N4521

 ! non possessive forms

+N+Sg+Nom:ым K ;
+N+Sg+Loc:ымт K ;
+N+Sg+Lat:мын K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:ымныл K ;
+N+Sg+Instr:мыл K ;
+N+Sg+Trans:миг K ;

+N+Du+Nom:мыг K ;
+N+Du+Loc:мыгт K ;
+N+Du+Lat:мыгн K ;
+N+Du+Abl:мыгныл K ;
+N+Du+Instr:мыгтыл K ;

+N+Pl+Nom:мыт K ;
+N+Pl+Loc:мытт K ;
+N+Pl+Lat:мытн K ;

+N+Pl+Lat:мытын K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:мытныл K ;
+N+Pl+Instr:мытыл K ;

 ! possessive forms

+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom:мум K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc:мумт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat:мумн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl:мумныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Instr:мумтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom:магум K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc:магумт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat:магумн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Abl:магумныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Instr:магумтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom:манум K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc:манумт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat:манумн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl:манумныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Instr:манумтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom:мын K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc:мынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat:мынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl:мынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Instr:мынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom:магын K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc:магынт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat:магынн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Abl:магынныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Instr:магынтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:ман K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:мант K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:манн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:манныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:мантыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:манын K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:манынт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:манынн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:манынныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:манынтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom:ме K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc:мет K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat:мен K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl:меныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Instr:метыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom:маге K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc:магет K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat:маген K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Abl:магеныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Instr:магетыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom:манэ K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc:манэт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat:манэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl:манэныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Instr:манэтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom:ымме̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc:ымме̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat:ымме̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Abl:ымме̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Instr:ымме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom:магме̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc:магме̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat:магме̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Abl:магме̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Instr:магме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom:манме̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc:манме̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat:манме̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Abl:манме̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Instr:манме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom:мын K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc:мынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat:мынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Abl:мынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Instr:мынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom:магы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc:магы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat:магы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Abl:магы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Instr:магы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:маны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:маны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:маны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:маны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:маны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:ман K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:мант K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:манн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:манныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:мантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom:ме̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc:ме̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat:ме̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Abl:ме̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Instr:ме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom:маге̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc:маге̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat:маге̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Abl:маге̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Instr:маге̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom:манэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc:манэнт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat:манэнн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Abl:манэнныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Instr:манэнтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom:мув K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc:мувт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat:мувн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl:мувныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Instr:мувтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom:магув K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc:магувт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat:магувн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Abl:магувныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Instr:магувтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom:манув K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc:манувт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat:манувн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl:манувныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Instr:манувтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom:мы̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc:мы̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat:мы̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl:мы̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Instr:мы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom:магы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc:магы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat:магы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Abl:магы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Instr:магы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:маны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:маны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:маны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:маны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:маны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:ман K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:мант K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:манн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:манныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:мантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom:маныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc:манылт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat:манылн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl:манылныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Instr:манылтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom:мага̄ныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc:мага̄нылт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat:мага̄нылн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Abl:мага̄нылныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Instr:мага̄нылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:мананыл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:мананылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:мананылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:мананылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:мананылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:ма̄ныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:ма̄нылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:ма̄нылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:ма̄нылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:ма̄нылтыл K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
